South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S189.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 7, Chapter 3, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-3-605.  (A) For purposes of this section, "bodily fluids" includes, but is not limited to, blood, feces, urine, or semen. (B) A person commits the offense of assault and battery with bodily fluids if he intentionally throws or attempts to throw bodily fluids onto another person without the person's consent. A person who violates the provisions of this subsection is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than five thousand dollars or imprisoned for not more than five years, or both. (C) A person who violates the provisions of subsection (B) who tests positive for a communicable or bloodborne disease is guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than ten thousand dollars or imprisoned for not more than ten years, or both. (D) A person charged with a violation of this section is subject to mandatory testing for communicable or bloodborne diseases when exposure to his bodily fluids is determined by law enforcement or a healthcare professional to pose a health risk to the victim of the offense. (E) A violation of this section is not considered a lesser-included offense of throwing bodily fluids on correctional officers or employees pursuant to the provisions of Section 24-13-470. The provisions of this section do not prohibit the prosecution of a person for a more serious offense if the person is determined to be HIV-positive or tests positive for another disease that may be transmitted through bodily fluids. (F) The provisions of this section do not apply to a person who is a "patient" as defined in Section 44-23-10. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----